Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 37
COLORADO INVESTMENT DEPOSITS

11-37-101 to 11-37-105. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire article repealed, p. 323, § 7, effective April 7.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990 and was not amended prior to its repeal in 2004. For the text of this article prior to 2004, consult the 2003 Colorado Revised Statutes.